Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3305
Board; majority vote.

Except as provided in section 77-3303 in respect of the issuance of subpoenas, all questions arising in the course of the proceeding shall be determined by majority vote of the board.

Laws 1976, LB 584, § 5.